Washington statutes.
RCW 15.17.060

Adoption of standards.

The director may adopt any United States or other state's standard for any fruits and vegetables, if that standard is determined by the director to be substantially equivalent to or better than the standard adopted under this chapter.

[ 1998 c 154 s 5; 1963 c 122 s 6.]